Hawaii statutes.
[§671D-2] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to provide incentives and protection for physicians engaging in
effective professional peer review. [L 1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of
§3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next